en: Pork nems, Egg roll with cooked pork, Nem with cooked pork
es: Nems De Cerdo
fr: Nems au porc, Nem au porc cuit, Pâté impérial au porc cuit
hr: Svinjski nems
it: Involtini di maiale
nl: Varkensloempias

en: Chicken nems, Egg roll with cooked chicken, Nem with cooked chicken
es: Nems de pollo
fr: Nems au poulet, Nem au poulet cuit, Pâté impérial au poulet cuit
hr: Pileće nemasice
it: Involtini di pollo
nl: Kiploempias

en: Egg roll with cooked shrimp, Nem with cooked shrimp
fr: Nem aux crevettes, Pâté impérial aux crevettes

en: Egg roll with cooked crab, Nem with cooked crab
fr: Nem au crabe, Pâté impérial au crabe

en: Spring rolls
de: Frühlingsrollen
es: Rollitos de primavera
fr: Rouleaux de printemps
hr: Proljetne rolice
it: Involtini primavera
ja: 春巻き
nl: Verse loempias, springrolls

en: Moussaka
da: Musaka
de: Moussaka
es: Musaca
fr: Moussaka
hr: Musaka
it: Moussakà
nl: Moussaka
pl: Musaka
pt: Mussaca
ro: Musaca
sk: Musaka
sv: Moussaka

en: Puff pastry meals, puff pastry dishes, flaky pastry meals, flaky pastry dishes
de: Blätterteiggerichte
fr: Feuilleté salé
hr: Jela od lisnatog tijesta
it: piatti pronti a base di pasta sfoglia
nl: Kant-en-klaar maaltijden met bladerdeeg

en: Ham croissants, Croissant filled with ham
de: Schinkencroissants
es: Croissants de jamón
fr: Croissants au jambon
hr: Kroasani sa šunkom
it: Cornetti al prosciutto
nl: Hamcroissants

en: Ham and cheese croissants, Croissant filled with ham and cheese
de: Schinken-Käse-Croissants
es: Croissants de jamón y queso
fr: Croissants au jambon fromage
hr: Kroasani sa šunkom i sirom
it: Cornetti al prosciutto e formaggio
nl: Ham-kaas croissants

en: Vol-au-vent in puff pastries, Filled vol-au-vent
de: Vol-au-vent, Königin-Pasteten, Pastetli, Bouchée
fr: Bouchée à la reine, Bouchée à la reine garnie
hr: Vol-au-vent
nl: Vol au vent

en: Vol-au-vent with fish and seafood
fr: Bouchées à la reine au poisson et aux fruits de mer, Bouchées à la reine au poisson, Bouchées à la reine aux fruits de mer

en: Vol-au-vent with meat, Vol-au-vent with poultry, Vol-au-vent with quenelle
fr: Bouchées à la reine à la viande, Bouchée à la reine à la viande

en: Vol-au-vent in sauce, Vol-au-vent
fr: Vol-au-vent en sauce

fr: Paniers feuilletés
nl: Bladerdeegbakjes, Bladerdeegpasteitjes

en: Fresh meals, Fresh prepared meals, Fresh prepared dishes
bg: Пресни ястия
ca: Plats preparats frescs
de: Frische Gerichte, Frisch zubereitete Gerichte
es: Comidas preparadas frescas, Platos preparados frescos
fi: tuoreateriat
fr: Plats préparés frais, plat préparé frais
he: מנות טריות
hr: Svježa jela
hu: Friss húsok
it: Piatti pronti freschi
lt: Švieži patiekalai, Šviežiai paruošti patiekalai
nl: Verse kant-en-klaar maaltijden
ru: Свежеприготовленные обеды

en: Fresh tabbouleh
de: frisches Taboulé
fr: Taboulés frais, taboulé frais
hr: Svježi tabule
nl: Verse taboulehs

en: Rice dishes
bg: Ястия с ориз
ca: Plats d'arròs
de: Reisgerichte
es: Platos de arroz
fi: Riisiateriat
fr: Plats à base de riz, plats préparés à base de riz
he: מנות אורז
hr: Jela od riže
it: Piatti a base di riso
ja: 米料理
lt: Ryžių patiekalai
nl: Rijstschotels
ru: Блюда из риса

en: Frittata
fr: Frittata
it: Frittata

en: Stuffed tomatoes, Stuffed tomato
fr: Tomates farcies, Tomate farcie
hr: Punjene rajčice
lt: Įdaryti pomidorai
nl: Gevulde tomaat

en: Stuffed tomatoes with rice, Rice stuffed tomatoes
fr: Tomates farcies et riz, tomates farcies au riz, Tomate farcie au riz
hr: Rižom punjene rajčice
lt: Ryžiais įdaryti pomidorai
nl: Tomaten gevuld met rijst